Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-211
Township; creation from city of second class; boundaries; alteration.

If any change is made in the corporate boundaries of any city of the second class, after same has been formed into a separate township, the county board of the county in which said city is situated shall have the power to make corresponding changes in the township boundaries of the said city township without either a petition for or notice of such proposed changes.

Laws 1915, c. 179, § 2, p. 363;

C.S.1922, § 897;

C.S.1929, § 26-211;

R.S.1943, § 23-211.